Maryland, session 2026, HB0763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0763*

HOUSE BILL 763
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this
subsection, an agency shall mail to an owner liable under subsection (c) of this section a
citation that shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
or a technician employed by or under contract with an agency that, based on inspection of
recorded images, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; and
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. [Is an admission of liability;
2.] May result in the refusal by the Administration to register
the motor vehicle; and
[3.] 2. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.